Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1022.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1481XC (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 257.11, subsection 5, paragraph d, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 d. (1) Supplementary weighting pursuant to this subsection 3 shall be available to a school district during the period 4 commencing with the budget year beginning July 1, 2014, through 5 the budget year beginning July 1, 2034. The maximum amount 6 of additional weighting for which a school district shall be 7 eligible in a budget year is twenty-one additional pupils ; 8 provided, however, that for budget years beginning on or after 9 July 1, 2024, the supplementary weighting assigned for a shared 10 operational function in the area of a college and career 11 transition counselor or coordinator shall not count toward this 12 maximum amount . Criteria for determining the qualification 13 of operational functions for supplementary weighting shall be 14 determined by the department by rule, through consideration of 15 increased student opportunities. 16 (2) For budget years beginning on or after July 1, 2024, 17 the supplementary weighting assigned for a shared operational 18 function in the area of a college and career transition 19 counselor or coordinator shall not count toward the maximum 20 amount of additional weighting for which a school district 21 shall be eligible in a budget year described in subparagraph 22 (1). 23 (3) For budget years beginning on or after July 1, 2025, 24 the supplementary weighting assigned for a shared operational 25 function in the area of a master social worker, an independent 26 social worker licensed under chapters 147 and 154C, a mental 27 health professional who holds a statement of recognition issued 28 by the board of educational examiners, or a school resource 29 officer shall not count toward the maximum amount of additional 30 weighting for which a school district shall be eligible in a 31 budget year described in subparagraph (1). 32